Maryland, session 2026, SB0111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
– 1 –

Ch. 487 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Transportation
12–110.
(a) (1) The Administration may take possession of any certificate of title,
registration card, permit, license, or registration plate:
[(1)] (I) That is fictitious;
[(2)] (II) That is issued by it and that:
[(i)] 1. Has expired;
[(ii)] 2. Has been canceled, suspended, or revoked; or
[(iii)] 3. Was issued unlawfully or erroneously; or
[(3)] (III) That has been issued by another jurisdiction but is being illegally
used or displayed.
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY TAKE POSSESSION OF ANY
REGISTRATION CARD OR REGISTRATION PLATE THAT HAS BEEN ISSUED BY
ANOTHER JURISDICTION BUT IS BEING USED OR DISPLAYED:
(I) BY A PERSON WHO HAS BEEN A RESIDENT OF THE STATE
FOR MORE THAN 60 DAYS; AND
(II) 1. BY A PERSON WHO HAS FAILED TO COMPLY WITH TWO
OR MORE TRAFFIC CITATIONS, INCLUDING CITATIONS GENERATED BY AUTOMATED
TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT SYSTEMS;
2. BY A PERSON WHOSE LICENSE OR PRIVILEGE TO
DRIVE IN THE STATE IS SUSPENDED UNDER § 16–203 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
3. ON A MOTOR VEHICLE WHOSE REGISTRATION HAS, AT
ANY POINT, BEEN SUSPENDED UNDER § 17–106(A) OF THIS ARTICLE FOR A PERIOD
OF 6 MONTHS OR MORE.
12–402.
It is the policy of this State to promote and encourage the fullest possible use of its
highway system by authorizing vehicle reciprocal or proportional registration agreements,
arrangements, and declarations with other jurisdictions as to vehicles registered in this
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 487
State and in those other jurisdictions, thus contributing to the SAFETY AND THE economic
and social development and growth of this State.
12–411.1.
(A) THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY MAKE AN AGREEMENT, AN ARRANGEMENT,
OR A DECLARATION WITH THE AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF ANY OTHER
JURISDICTION TO PROVIDE FOR RECIPROCAL ENFORCEMENT OF VIOLATIONS
RECORDED BY TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEMS AND SPEED
MONITORING AUTOMATED TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT SYSTEMS BETWEEN THE STATE
AND THE OTHER JURISDICTION.
(B) AN AGREEMENT, AN ARRANGEMENT, OR A DECLARATION MADE UNDER
THIS SECTION MAY AUTHORIZE THE ADMINISTRATION TO REFUSE TO REGISTER OR
REREGISTER A MOTOR VEHICLE.
13–402.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section or elsewhere in the
Maryland Vehicle Law, each motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, and pole trailer driven on
a highway shall be registered under this subtitle.
(2) If a motor vehicle required to be registered under this subtitle is not
registered, a person may not park the unregistered motor vehicle on any:
(i) Public alley, street, or highway; or
(ii) Private property used by the public in general, including parking
lots of shopping centers, condominiums, apartments, or town house developments.
(3) The provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection do not apply to a
motor vehicle that is exempt from registration under this section or § 13–402.1 of this
subtitle.
(c) Registration under this subtitle is not required for:
(7) A vehicle owned by a new resident of this State during the first 60 days
of residency provided the vehicle displays valid registration issued by the jurisdiction of the
resident’s former domicile;
(1) A vehicle that is driven on a highway:
(i) In conformity with the provisions of this title relating to
manufacturers, transporters, dealers, secured parties, owners or operators of special mobile
equipment, or nonresidents; or
– 3 –

Ch. 487 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) Under a temporary registration card issued by the
Administration;
(2) A vehicle owned and used by the United States, unless an authorized
officer or employee of the United States requests registration of the vehicle;
(3) A farm tractor or any farm equipment;
(4) A vehicle the front or rear wheels of which are lifted from the highway;
(5) A towed vehicle that is attached to the towing vehicle by a tow bar and
for which no driver is necessary;
(6) A vehicle owned by and in the possession of a licensed dealer for purpose
of sale;
(7) A vehicle owned by a new resident of this State during the first 60 days
of residency provided the vehicle displays valid registration issued by the jurisdiction of the
resident’s former domicile;
(8) New vehicles being operated as part of a shuttle, as defined in § 13–626
of this title, while following a registered vehicle displaying a shuttle permit issued by the
Administration;
(9) A vehicle operated in connection with maritime commerce exclusively
within any terminal owned or leased by the Maryland Port Administration;
(10) A snowmobile that is operated on highways and roadways as prescribed
by § 25–102(a)(14) of this article;
(11) A golf cart that is operated on a highway in accordance with § 21–104.2
of this article;
(12) A golf cart that is operated on an Allegany County highway as allowed
by the county under § 25–102(a)(16) of this article;
(13) A vehicle owned by an accredited consular or diplomatic officer of a
foreign government and operated for official or personal purposes when the vehicle displays
a valid diplomatic license plate issued by the United States government; [or]
(14) A personal delivery device that is operated on a roadway, sidewalk,
shoulder, or crosswalk in accordance with § 21–104.3 of this article; OR
(15) A TRAILER, SEMITRAILER, OR POLE TRAILER THAT DISPLAYS
VALID REGISTRATION ISSUED BY ANOTHER JURISDICTION.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 487
13–810.
(a) On issuance in this State of an original or subsequent certificate of title for a
vehicle, the vehicle is exempt from the excise tax imposed by this part, if it is:
(26) A ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, A VEHICLE THAT:
(I) WAS PREVIOUSLY REGISTERED IN THE STATE;
(II) WAS SUBSEQUENTLY REGISTERED IN ANOTHER
JURISDICTION DESPITE THE OWNER OF THE VEHICLE CONTINUING TO BE A
RESIDENT OF THE STATE; AND
(III) IS BEING REGISTERED IN THE STATE TO COMPLY WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF § 13–402 OF THIS TITLE.
15–109.
(A) [In] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, IN addition to any
other grounds specified in this title for refusal, suspension, or revocation of a license, the
Administration may refuse to grant a license under this title to any person and may
suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the license of any person if it finds that:
(1) The person has violated or is attempting to violate any provision of this
title or any rule or regulation adopted under this title;
(2) The person has violated or is attempting to violate any of the other
provisions of the Maryland Vehicle Law that relate to the business or activity of that
person; or
(3) Any officer, manager, agent, or employee of the person has violated or
is attempting to violate any provision of this title, any rule or regulation adopted under this
title, or any of the other provisions of the Maryland Vehicle Law that relate to the business
or activity of the person, unless the Administration is satisfied that the individuals engaged
in the management of the business or activity:
(i) Had no knowledge of the wrongful conduct; or
(ii) Were unable to prevent the violation or attempted violation.
(B) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL SUSPEND THE LICENSE OF A PERSON IF
IT FINDS THAT THE PERSON VIOLATED § 15–606(F) OF THIS TITLE.
15–606.
– 5 –

Ch. 487 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) A title service agent or an agent or employee of a title service agent may not
make any material misrepresentation on any form of the Administration.
(b) A title service agent or an agent or employee of a title service agent may not
misrepresent any material fact in obtaining a license.
(c) A title service agent or an agent or employee of a title service agent may not
willfully fail to notify the Administration of any change in the ownership, management,
name, or location of the business conducted under the license.
(d) A title service agent or an agent or employee of a title service agent may not
fail to account for and remit to the Administration any fees received by him for any
certificates of title, registrations, drivers’ licenses, certified copies of records, or other
related documents.
(e) A title service agent or an agent or employee of a title service agent may not
conduct any title service agency business with or through any person required to be licensed
under this title if he knows that the person is not licensed.
(F) A TITLE SERVICE AGENT OR AN AGENT OR EMPLOYEE OF A TITLE
SERVICE AGENT MAY NOT SELL, OFFER FOR SALE, ADVERTISE, OR FACILITATE THE
SALE OF A MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION ISSUED BY ANOTHER JURISDICTION TO
A RESIDENT OF THE STATE.
[(f)] (G) A title service agent or an agent or employee of a title service agent may
not willfully violate any provision of the Maryland Vehicle Law that relates to the business
of a title service agent.
[(g)] (H) A title service agent or an agent or employee of a title service agent may
not willfully fail to comply with any rule, regulation, or lawful order adopted by the
Administration under this title.
26–301.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, any State agency authorized by law
and any political subdivision of this State may adopt ordinances or regulations that:
(1) Regulate the parking of vehicles;
(2) Provide for the impounding of vehicles parked in violation of the
ordinances or regulations;
(3) Regulate the towing of vehicles from publicly owned and privately
owned parking lots; and
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 487
(4) Provide for the issuance of a citation by an officer for a violation of an
ordinance or regulation that is adopted under this section. SECTION; AND
(5) AUTHORIZE AN EMPLOYEE OR AGENT OF THE STATE AGENCY OR
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION TO TAKE POSSESSION OF ANY REGISTRATION PLATE
DESCRIBED IN § 12–110(A)(2) OF THIS ARTICLE THAT IS BEING DISPLAYED BY A
PARKED VEHICLE.
(B–1) (1) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTY PROVIDED FOR IN THE
MARYLAND VEHICLE LAW, IF THE ADMINISTRATION HAS PROBABLE REASONABLE
CAUSE TO BELIEVE THAT A MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER IS A RESIDENT OF THE STATE
AND HAS FAILED TO PROPERLY REGISTER THE MOTOR VEHICLE WITH THE
ADMINISTRATION AND DISPLAY VALID REGISTRATION PLATES ISSUED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION ON THE MOTOR VEHICLE, THE MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER IS
SUBJECT TO A WARNING REQUIRING THE MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER, WITHIN 60 DAYS
AFTER ISSUANCE OF THE WARNING, TO:
(I) PROPERLY REGISTER THE MOTOR VEHICLE WITH THE
ADMINISTRATION AND DISPLAY VALID REGISTRATION PLATES ISSUED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION ON THE MOTOR VEHICLE; OR
(II) PROVIDE PROOF ACCEPTABLE TO THE ADMINISTRATION
THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS NOT REQUIRED TO BE REGISTERED IN THE STATE.
(2) (I) IF THE MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER PROVIDES PROOF
ACCEPTABLE TO THE ADMINISTRATION THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS NOT
REQUIRED TO BE REGISTERED IN THE STATE, IF APPLICABLE AS DETERMINED BY
THE ADMINISTRATION, THE MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER SHALL OBTAIN AND DISPLAY
ON THE MOTOR VEHICLE A NONRESIDENT PERMIT ISSUED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION.
(II) IF THE MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER FAILS, WITHIN 60 DAYS
AFTER ISSUANCE OF A WARNING UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, TO PROPERLY REGISTER
THE MOTOR VEHICLE AND DISPLAY VALID REGISTRATION PLATES ON THE MOTOR
VEHICLE OR PROVIDE PROOF ACCEPTABLE TO THE ADMINISTRATION THAT
REGISTRATION IN THE STATE IS NOT REQUIRED, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL
BEGIN TO ASSESS A CIVIL FINE AGAINST THE MOTOR VEHICLE OF $7 PER DAY FOR
UP TO 60 DAYS OR UNTIL THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS PROPERLY REGISTERED AND
DISPLAYING VALID REGISTRATION PLATES OR THE ADMINISTRATION DETERMINES
THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS NOT SUBJECT TO REGISTRATION IN THE STATE,
WHICHEVER OCCURS FIRST.
– 7 –

Ch. 487 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL NOTIFY THE APPROPRIATE
LOCAL JURISDICTION IF A MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER FAILS, WITHIN 120 DAYS AFTER
ISSUANCE OF A WARNING UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, TO PROPERLY REGISTER THE
MOTOR VEHICLE AND DISPLAY VALID REGISTRATION PLATES ON THE MOTOR
VEHICLE OR SATISFY THE ADMINISTRATION THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS NOT
SUBJECT TO REGISTRATION IN THE STATE.
(II) THE APPROPRIATE COUNTY STATE’S ATTORNEY ATTORNEY
MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION IN REM AGAINST A MOTOR VEHICLE FOR WHICH THE
MOTOR VEHICLE OWNER FAILS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION TO PROPERLY REGISTER
AND DISPLAY VALID REGISTRATION PLATES OR TO SATISFY THE ADMINISTRATION
THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS NOT SUBJECT TO REGISTRATION IN THE STATE.
(III) IN A CIVIL ACTION IN REM BROUGHT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE APPROPRIATE COUNTY STATE’S ATTORNEY ATTORNEY MAY SEEK
IMMOBILIZATION OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE BY TOWING OR REMOVAL AND
IMPOUNDMENT OR BY BOOTING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 8 –